Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201358-858
Nebraska Health Education Assistance Loan Program; authority; powers.

The authority may:

(1) Make loans;

(2) Participate in the financing of loans;

(3) Purchase or participate in the purchase of loans;

(4) Sell or participate in the sale of loans;

(5) Collect and pay reasonable fees and charges in connection
with the exercise of the powers provided in subdivisions (1) through (4) of
this section;

(6) Do all things necessary and convenient to carry out the
purposes of sections 58-857
to 58-862 in connection with the administering and servicing of
loans, including contracting with any person, firm, or other body, public
or private;

(7) Enter into any agreements necessary to effect the guarantee,
insuring, administering, or servicing of loans;

(8) Adopt and promulgate rules and regulations governing
and establish standards for participation in the program created by section 58-857, and establish other administrative procedures
consistent with Public Law 94-484; and

(9) Exercise all powers incidental to or necessary for the
performance of the powers authorized by this section.

Laws 1983, LB 159, § 8;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2955;

Laws 1995, LB 5, § 55;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 85-1755;

Laws 2013, LB170, § 58.